hyph_sq_AL.dic
UTF-8
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a2
2a.
2a1a
2e1a
2ë1a
2i1a
2o1a
2u1a
2y1a
.b2
.bash2k3ad2
.bash2k3a2k2
.bash2k3a2n
.bash2k3at2dh
.bash2k3a2u2
.bash2k3e2d2
.bash2k3ek2
.bash2k3i2n
.bash2k3u2dh
.bash2k3y2j
2b.
2bç.
2bq.
2bs.
2bsh.
2bth.
2a1b
2b1b
2c1b
2ç1b
2d1b
2e1b
2ë1b
2f1b
2g1b
2gj1b
2i1b
2j1b
2k1b
2l1b
2ll1b
m1b
m2ba
m2be
m2bë
m2bi
m2bo
m2bu
m2by
m2bledh
2n1b
2o1b
2p1b
2q1b
2r1b
2rr1b
2s1b
2sh1b
2t1b
2u1b
2y1b
2z1b
2zh1b
.c2
2c.
2ck.
2csh.
2a1c
2b1c
2c1c
2dh1c
2e1c
2ë1c
2f1c
2g1c
2h1c
2i1c
2j1c
2k1c
2l1c
2ll1c
2m1c
2n1c
2o1c
2p1c
2r1c
2rr1c
2s1c
2sh1c
2t1c
2u1c
2v1c
2x1c
2y1c
.ç2
.ç2m2b2
.ç2m2p2
.ç2n2
.ç2n2d2
2ç.
2çsh.
2a1ç
2b1ç
2d1ç
2dh1ç
2e1ç
2ë1ç
2f1ç
2g1ç
2h1ç
2i1ç
2j1ç
2k1ç
2l1ç
2ll1ç
2m1ç
2n1ç
2nj1ç
2o1ç
2p1ç
2r1ç
2rr1ç
2s1ç
2sh1ç
2t1ç
2th1ç
2u1ç
2y1ç
2z1ç
.d2
2d.
2dç.
2dk.
2drr.
2dsh.
2dth.
2a1d
2b1d
2ç1d
2d1d
2e1d
2ë1d
2f1d
2g1d
2i1d
2j1d
2k1d
2l1d
2ll1d
2m1d
n1d
n2da
n2de
n2dë
n2di
n2do
n2du
n2dy
i2n2d
2o1d
2p1d
2q1d
2r1d
2rr1d
2s1d
2sh1d
2t1d
2th1d
u1d
v1d
v2da
v2de
v2dë
v2di
v2do
v2du
2y1d
2z1d
2zh1d
.dh2
2dh.
2dhc.
2dhç.
2dhsh.
2a1dh
2e1dh
2ë1dh
2g1dh
2gj1dh
2h1dh
2i1dh
2j1dh
2k1dh
2m1dh
2ë2n1dh
2o1dh
2r1dh
2rr1dh
2s1dh
2t1dh
u1dh
2v1dh
2xh1dh
2y1dh
2zh1dh
.e2
.e2zh2
2e.
2a1e
2e1e
2ë1e
2i1e
2o1e
.ë2
2ë.
2a1ë
2e1ë
2ë1ë
2i1ë
2o1ë
2u1ë
2y1ë
.f2
2f.
2fç.
2fk.
2fsh.
2ft.
2a1f
2b1f
2c1f
2ç1f
2d1f
2e1f
2ë1f
2g1f
2i1f
2j1f
2k1f
2l1f
2ll1f
2m1f
2n1f
2o1f
2p1f
2q1f
2r1f
2rr1f
2s1f
2sh1fe
2sh1fë
2sh1fl
2sh1fu
2sh1fo
s1sh2f
2t1f
2th1f
2u1f
2y1f
.g2
2g.
2gsh.
2gth.
2a1g
2c1g
2d1g
2e1g
2ë1g
2f1g
2i1g
2j1g
2k1g
2l1g
2ll1g
2m1g
n1g
n2ga
n2ge
n2gë
n2gi
n2go
n2gu
2o1g
2p1g
2r1g
2rr1g
2s1g
2sh1g
2t1g
2u1g
2v1g
2y1g
2z1g
2zh1g
.gj2
2gj.
2gjsh.
2a1gj
2ç1gj
2d1gj
2e1gj
2ë1gj
2g1gj
2h1gj
2i1gj
2j1gj
2k1gj
2l1gj
2ll1gj
2m1gj
n1gj
n2gja
n2gje
n2gjë
n2gji
n2gjo
n2gju
n2gjy
2nj1gj
2o1gj
2p1gj
2r1gj
2rr1gj
2s1gj
2sh1gj
2t1gj
2u1gj
2v1gj
2y1gj
2z1gj
2zh1gj
.h2
2h.
2hç.
2hsh.
2ht.
2a1h
2b1h
2ç1h
2e1h
2ë1h
2f1h
2g1h
2gj1h
2h1h
2i1h
2j1h
2k1h
2l1h
2ll1h
2m1h
2n1h
2o1h
2p1h
2q1h
2r1h
2rr1h
2sh1h
2th1h
2u1h
2xh1h
2y1h
.i2
2i.
2a1i
2e1i
2ë1i
2i1i
2o1i
2u1i
2y1i
.j2
2j.
2jc.
2jç.
2jd.
2jf.
2jh.
2jk.
2jl.
2jm.
2jn.
2jp.
2jq.
2js.
2jth.
2jz.
2a1j
2d1j
r1v2d2j
2dh1j
2e1j
2ë1j
2gj1j
nj2o2h1j
2i1j
2j1j
je2k1j
r2e2k1j
2nj1j
shke2l1j
2o1j
f2a2q1j
2r1j
2rr1j
2s1j
2sh1j
2t1j
2th1j
2u1j
2xh1j
2y1j
2zh1j
.k2
.k2th2
2k.
2kç.
2ks.
2ksh.
2kt.
2kth.
a1k
a2k1t
2b1k
2c1k
2ç1k
2d1k
2dh1k
e1k
e2k1t
2ë1k
2f1k
2g1k
2gj1k
2h1k
i1k
i2k1t
2j1k
2k1k
2l1k
2ll1k
2m1k
2n1k
2nj1k
o1k
o2k1t
2p1k
2q1k
2r1k
2rr1k
2s1k
2sh1k
s1sh2k
2t1k
2th1k
u1k
u2k1t
2v1k
2xh1k
y1k
y2k1t
2z1k
2zh1k
.l2
2l.
2lb.
2lc.
2lç.
2ld.
2lf.
2lg.
2lk.
2lm.
2ln.
2lp.
2lq.
2ls.
2lsh.
2lt.
2lth.
2lz.
2a1l
2c1l
2ç1l
2d1l
2dh1l
2e1l
a3sh2ke1l
e3sh2ke1l
ë3sh2ke1l
i3sh2ke1l
2ë1l
f2l
2g1l
2gj1l
2h1l
2i1l
2j1l
2k1l
2m1l
2n1l
2nj1l
2o1l
p2l
2q1l
2r1l
2rr1l
2s1l
2sh1l
s1sh2l
2t1l
2th1l
2u1l
2v1l
2xh1l
2y1l
2z1l
2zh1l
.ll2
2ll.
2llc.
2llç.
2llg.
2llk.
2llm.
2llp.
2lls.
2llsh.
2llt.
2a1ll
2b1ll
2c1ll
2ç1ll
2d1ll
2e1ll
2ë1ll
2f1ll
2g1ll
2h1ll
2i1ll
2j1ll
2k1ll
2m1ll
2n1ll
2o1ll
2p1ll
2r1ll
2rr1ll
2s1ll
2sh1ll
2t1ll
2u1ll
2v1ll
2xh1ll
2y1ll
2z1ll
.m2
.m2b2
.m2o2s3a2r
.m2o2s3h2a2p1
.m2o2s3h2a2r1m
.m2o2s3h2a3rr
.m2o2s3h2a2r1x
.m2o2s3h2e2dh
.m2o2s3h2e2q1
.m2o2s3h2u2m2b1
.m2o2s3h2y
.m2o2s3i2
.m2o2s3m2
.m2o2s3n2d2
.m2o2s3o2
.m2o2s3s2
.m2o2s3sh2
.m2o2s3sh2t2
.m2o2s3t2
.m2o2s3u2
.m2o2s3v2
.m2o2s3z2
.m2o2s3zh2v
2m.
2mb.
2mc.
2mç.
2mf.
2mp.
2ms.
2msh.
2mt.
2mth.
2a1m
2b1m
2c1m
2ç1m
2d1m
2dh1m
2e1m
2ë1m
2f1m
2g1m
2gj1m
2h1m
2i1m
2j1m
2k1m
2l1m
2ll1m
2m1m
2n1m
2nj1m
2o1m
2p1m
2q1m
2r1m
2rr1m
2s1m
sh1m
sh2me
sh2më
sh2mi
sh2mj
2t1m
2th1m
2u1m
2v1m
2xh1m
2y1m
z1m
z2ma
z2me
z2më
z2mi
z2mo
z2mu
2zh1m
.n2
.n2d2
2n.
2nc.
2nç.
2nd.
2ng.
2ngj.
2nk.
2ns.
2nsh.
2nt.
2nth.
2nx.
2nxh.
2nz.
2a1n
2b1n
2c1n
2ç1n
2d1n
2dh1n
2e1n
2ë1n
2f1n
2g1n
2gj1n
2h1n
2i1n
a3i2n.
2j1n
2k1n
2l1n
2ll1n
2m1n
2n1n
2nj1n
2o1n
2p1n
2q1n
2r1n
2rr1n
2s1n
2sh1n
2t1n
2th1n
2u1n
2v1n
2y1n
2z1n
2zh1n
.nj2
2nj.
2njç.
2njsh.
2njt.
2njth.
2a1nj
2dh1nj
2e1nj
2ë1nj
2f1nj
2h1nj
2i1nj
2j1nj
2k1nj
2l1nj
2m1nj
2o1nj
2p1nj
2r1nj
2rr1nj
2s1nj
2sh1nj
2t1nj
2th1nj
2u1nj
2y1nj
2zh1nj
.o2
2o.
2a1o
2e1o
2ë1o
2i1o
2o1o
2u1o
2y1o
.p2
.pë2r3a2
.pë2r3d2
.pë2r3e2
.pë2r3i2
.pë2r3k2
.pë2r3sh2
.pë2r3u2
.pë2r3z2
.pë1sht2
2p.
2pc.
2pç.
2ps.
2psh.
2pt.
2pth.
2a1p
2c1p
2ç1p
2d1p
2dh1p
2e1p
2ë1p
2f1p
2g1p
2i1p
2j1p
2k1p
2l1p
2ll1p
2m1p
2n1p
2nj1p
2o1p
2p1p
2q1p
2r1p
2rr1p
2s1p
sh1p
sh2pa
sh2pe
sh2pë
sh2pi
sh2po
sh2pu
sh2py
2t1p
2th1p
2u1p
2xh1p
2y1p
2z1p
.q2
2q.
2qsh.
2qth.
2a1q
2b1q
2ç1q
2d1q
2e1q
2ë1q
2f1q
2g1q
2h1q
2i1q
2j1q
2k1q
2l1q
2ll1q
2m1q
2n1q
2o1q
2p1q
2q1q
2r1q
2rr1q
2s1q
sh1q
sh2qa
sh2qe
sh2qi
sh2qo
sh2qu
sh2qy
2t1q
2th1q
2u1q
2y1q
.r2
2r.
2rb.
2rc.
2rç.
2rd.
2rdh.
2rf.
2rg.
2rgj.
2rk.
2rm.
2rn.
2rp.
2rq.
2rs.
2rsh.
2rt.
2rth.
2rv.
2rxh.
2rz.
2rzh.
2a1r
2b1r
2c1r
2ç1r
2d1r
2dh1r
2e1r
ë1r
ë2r1u2dh
f1r
f2ra
f2re
f2rë
f2ri
f2ro
f2ru
f2ry
g1r
s1n2g2r
g2ra
g2re
g2rë
g2ri
g2ro
g2ru
g2ry
gj1r
gj2ra
gj2re
gj2rë
gj2ri
2h1r
2i1r
2j1r
k1r
k2ra
k2re
k2rë
k2ri
k2ro
k2ru
k2ry
2l1r
2ll1r
2m1r
2n1r
2nj1r
2o1r
p1r
p2ra
p2re
p2rë
p2ri
p2ro
p2ru
2q1r
2s1r
2sh1r
t1r
s2h2t2r2
t2ra
t2re
t2rë
t2ri
t2ro
t2ru
t2ry
2th1r
2u1r
v1r
v2ra
v2re
v2rë
v2ri
v2ro
v2ru
x1r
x2ra
x2ri
2xh1r
2y1r
z1r
z2ra
z2re
z2ri
.rr2
2rr.
2rrc.
2rrç.
2rrk.
2rrn.
2rrp.
2rrsh.
2rrt.
2rrth.
2a1rr
2b1rr
2c1rr
2ç1rr
2d1rr
2dh1rr
2e1rr
2ë1rr
f1rr
f2rra
f2rre
f2rrë
f2rri
f2rro
f2rru
g1rr
g2rra
g2rre
g2rrë
g2rro
g2rry
2h1rr
2i1rr
2j1rr
2k1rr
2ll1rr
2m1rr
2n1rr
2o1rr
2p1rr
2q1rr
2s1rr
2sh1rr
2t1rr
2th1rr
2u1rr
2v1rr
2x1rr
2xh1rr
2y1rr
2z1rr
2zh1rr
.s2
.s2f2
.s2k2
.s2p2
.s2t2
2s.
2sk.
2sm.
2sp.
2sq.
2ssh.
2st.
2a1s
2b1s
2ç1s
2d1s
2e1s
2ë1s
f1s
2g1s
2h1s
2i1s
2j1s
2k1s
2l1s
2ll1s
2m1s
2n1s
2o1s
2p1s
2q1s
2r1s
2rr1s
2s1s
2sh1s
2t1s
2th1s
2u1s
2v1s
2y1s
2z1s
.sh2
.sh2f2
.sh2k2
.sh2n2
.sh2n2d2
.sh2p2
.sh2t2
.shu2m3a2n
.shu2m3a2tom
.shu2m3e2m
.shu2m3et2
.shu2m3i2n
2sh.
2shç.
2shk.
2shq.
2shsh.
2sht.
2a1sh
2b1sh
2c1sh
2ç1sh
2d1sh
2dh1sh
2e1sh
2ë1sh
f1sh
f2sha
f2she
f2shë
f2shi
f2sho
f2shu
2g1sh
2gj1sh
2h1sh
2i1sh
2j1sh
2k1sh
2l1sh
2ll1sh
2m1sh
2n1sh
2nj1sh
2o1sh
2p1sh
2q1sh
2r1sh
2rr1sh
2s1sh
2sh1sh
2t1sh
2th1sh
2u1sh
2v1sh
2y1sh
2z1sh
.t2
2t.
2tk.
2tm.
2tq.
2tsh.
2tth.
2a1t
2b1t
2c1t
2ç1t
2d1t
2dh1t
2e1t
2ë1t
2f1t
2g1t
2gj1t
2h1t
2i1t
a3i2t.
2j1t
k1t
2l1t
2ll1t
2m1t
2n1t
2nj1t
2o1t
2p1t
2q1t
2r1t
2rr1t
2s1t
sh1t
sh2ta
sh2te
sh2të
sh2ti
sh2to
sh2tu
sh2ty
2t1t
2th1t
2u1t
2v1t
2xh1t
2y1t
2z1t
2zh1t
.th2
2th.
2thsh.
2a1th
2b1th
2c1th
2d1th
2e1th
2ë1th
2f1th
2g1th
2h1th
2i1th
2j1th
k1th
r2k1tha
r1k2theh
r1k2thej
r1k2thev
r1k2thye
s1k2th
k2th2j
2l1th
2ll1th
2m1th
2n1th
2nj1th
2o1th
2p1th
2q1th
2r1th
2rr1th
2s1th
2sh1th
2t1th
2u1th
2y1th
2z1th
.u2
2u.
2a1u
2e1u
2ë1u
2i1u
2o1u
2u1u
2y1u
.v2
2v.
2vc.
2vd.
2vg.
2vgj.
2vsh.
2a1v
2b1v
2c1v
2ç1v
2d1v
2e1v
2ë1v
2g1v
2gj1v
2h1v
2i1v
2j1v
2k1v
2l1v
2ll1v
2m1v
2n1v
2nj1v
2o1v
2p1v
2q1v
2r1v
2rr1v
2s1v
2sh1v
2t1v
2th1v
2u1v
2xh1v
2y1v
2z1v
2zh1v
.x2
2x.
2a1x
2e1x
2ë1x
2i1x
n2x
2o1x
2r1x
2rr1x
2sh1x
2u1x
2y1x
.xh2
2xh.
2a1xh
2e1xh
2ë1xh
2g1xh
2i1xh
2j1xh
2l1xh
2ll1xh
2m1xh
2n1xh
2o1xh
2r1xh
2rr1xh
2sh1xh
2u1xh
2y1xh
.y2
2y.
2a1y
2e1y
2ë1y
2i1y
2o1y
2u1y
2y1y
.z2
.z2b2
.z2b2r2
.z2d2
.z2g2
.z2m2b2
.z2v2
2z.
2zç.
2zg.
2zm.
2zsh.
2a1z
2b1z
2d1z
2e1z
2ë1z
2f1z
2g1z
2gj1z
2i1z
2j1z
2k1z
2l1z
2ll1z
2m1z
2n1z
2o1z
2p1z
2q1z
2r1z
2rr1z
2s1z
2sh1z
2t1z
2u1z
2v1z
2y1z
2z1z
.zh2
.zh2b2
.zh2d2
.zh2dh2
.zh2g2
.zh2v2
2zh.
2zhd.
2zhg.
2a1zh
2b1zh
2e1zh
2ë1zh
2i1zh
2k1zh
2n1zh
2o1zh
2r1zh
2rr1zh
2s1zh
2t1zh
2u1zh
2y1zh
